el: Αθλητικά είδη > Εξοπλισμός για γενική άσκηση & φυσική κατάσταση > Ιμάντες αιώρησης για προπόνηση: Σετ πλήρους ανάρτησης σώματος; Λαβές και ιμάντες ανάρτησης; Αξεσουάρ προπόνησης με αναρτήσεις
nl: Sportartikelen > Fitness- en algemene trainingsapparaten > Suspensiontrainers: Suspensionkits voor het hele lichaam; Suspensionhandgrepen en -bandjes; Suspensiontrainingshulpmiddelen
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipos de fitness y ejercicio general > Sistemas de entrenamiento en suspensión: Kits de suspensión de cuerpo completo; Asas y correas de suspensión; Accesorios para entrenamiento en suspensión
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Vybavení pro fitness a běžné cvičení > Závěsné tréninkové systémy: Celotělové závěsné sady; Závěsné úchyty a popruhy; Závěsný trénink – příslušenství
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > อุปกรณ์ออกกำลังกายทั่วไปและฟิตเนส > อุปกรณ์ฝึกประเภทสาย: ชุดฝึกประเภทสายแบบเต็มตัว; มือจับและสายรัดสำหรับฝึก; อุปกรณ์เสริมการฝึกประเภทสาย
fr: Équipements sportifs > Équipement de fitness et d’exercice général > Sangles de suspension: Kits de suspension complète; Poignées et sangles de suspension; Accessoires d’entraînement en suspension
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Fitness ve Genel Egzersiz Ekipmanları > Egzersiz Askıları: Tam Vücut Süspansiyon Kitleri; Süspansiyon Kolları ve Askıları; Süspansiyon Eğitim Aksesuarları
da: Sportsartikler > Fitness og almindeligt træningsudstyr > Elastiktræning: Ophængssæt til hele kroppen; Ophængshåndtag og stropper; Ophængstræningstilbehør
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 健身及一般運動器材 > 懸掛訓練繩: 全身懸掛工具包; 懸掛手把和背帶; 懸掛訓練配件
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Оборудване за фитнес и общи упражнения > Тренировъчни системи за окачване: Тренировъчни системи за окачване за цялото тяло; Ръкохватки и ремъци за тренировки с окачване; Аксесоари за тренировки с окачване
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Kuntoilu- ja yleiskuntolaitteet > Suspensioharjoitteluvälineet: Koko kehon suspensiosetit; Suspensiokahvat ja -hihnat; Suspensioharjoittelun lisävälineet
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Oprema za fitnes in splošno vadbo > Vadbeni trakovi: Kompleti vzmetenja za vadbo celotnega telesa; Ročke in trakovi za TRX vadbo; Dodatki za vadbo s trakovi
ru: Спортивные товары > Фитнес и физические упражнения > Функциональные петли: Наборы для проработки всего тела; Ручки и ремни для функциональных петель; Аксессуары для функциональных петель
ja: スポーツ用品 > フィットネス・一般的な運動器具 > サスペンショントレーナー: フルボディ サスペンションキット; サスペンションハンドル・ストラップ; サスペンショントレーニング関連用品
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sprzęt fitness i ogólny do ćwiczeń > Pasy treningowe: Atlas do ćwiczeń; Pasy i uchwyty do treningu w zawieszeniu; Akcesoria do treningu w zawieszeniu
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Thiết bị tập thể thao & thể dục tổng hợp > Đai treo: Bộ sản phẩm treo toàn thân; Tay cầm & dây treo; Phụ kiện tập luyện treo
de: Sportartikel > Fitness- & allgemeine Trainingsgeräte > Suspension Trainer: Ganzkörper-Suspension-Kits; Suspension-Griffe und -gurte; Suspension-Trainingszubehör
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Equipamentos para fitness e exercícios gerais > Equipamentos de treino de suspensão: Kits de suspensão para corpo inteiro; Alças e faixas para suspensão; Acessórios para treino de suspensão
en: Sporting Goods > Fitness & General Exercise Equipment > Suspension Trainers: Full Body Suspension Kits; Suspension Handles & Straps; Suspension Training Accessories
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Vybavenie na fitness a cvičenie > Závesné trenažéry: Závesné súpravy na celé telo; Závesné rúčky a popruhy; Príslušenstvo pre závesný systém
nb: Sportsutstyr > Utstyr for fitness- og generell trening > Suspensjonstrenere: Opphengssett for hele kroppen; Opphengshåndtak og -stropper; Tilbehør for opphengstrening
hu: Sportszerek > Fitnesz és általános edzőfelszerelés > Felfüggesztési trénerek: Teljes testes felfüggesztési készletek; Felfüggesztési fogantyúk és pántok; Felfüggesztési edzőkiegészítők
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Oprema za fitness i tjelovježbu > Suspenzijski trenažeri: Kompleti za suspenzijski trening; Ručke i trake za ovjes; Pribor za suspenzijski trening
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Equipamentos de fitness e exercícios gerais > Fitas de suspensão: Kits de suspensão de corpo inteiro; Alças e correias de suspensão; Acessórios de treinamento de suspensão
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 健身与一般运动器材 > 悬挂训练设备: 全身悬挂装备套件; 悬挂手柄/绑带; 悬挂训练配件
it: Articoli sportivi > Attrezzature per fitness e esercizi generali > Attrezzi per allenamento in sospensione: Kit di sospensione per total body; Maniglie e cinghie di sospensione; Accessori per allenamento in sospensione
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Fitneso ir bendrojo pobūdžio treniruočių įranga > Kabamieji treniruokliai: Viso kūno kabamųjų treniruočių rinkiniai; Kabamųjų treniruočių rankenos ir diržai; Kabamųjų treniruočių priedai
sv: Sportartiklar > Fitness- och allmän träningsutrustning > Redskap för suspensionsträning: Helkroppssuspensionssatser; Suspensionshandtag och -remmar; Suspensionsträningstillbehör
ko: 스포츠용품 > 피트니스/일반 운동 장비 > 서스펜션 트레이너: 전신 서스펜션 키트; 서스펜션 핸들/스트랩; 서스펜션 트레이닝 부대용품
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Echipamente pentru fitness și exerciții fizice > Articole pentru antrenamente de suspensie: Seturi suspensie pentru tot corpul; Mânere și curele pentru suspensie; Accesorii pentru antrenamente de suspensie